Indiana, session 2026, SB138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-5-4.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.90-2011,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) The superintendent is responsible for
selecting and discharging principals, central office administrators,
business managers, superintendents of building and grounds, janitors,
physicians, dentists, nurses, athletic coaches (whether or not they are
otherwise employed by the school corporation and whether or not they
are licensed under IC 20-28-5), and any other employees necessary to
the operation of the school corporation, subject to the approval of the
governing body.
(b) Subject to IC 20-28-7.5, the superintendent and principal are
responsible for selecting and discharging teachers, teachers aides,
assistant principals, building administrative staff, librarians, school
chaplains (as defined in IC 20-26-22.1-2), and any other employees
necessary to the operation of the school, subject to the approval of the
governing body.
SECTION 2. IC 20-26-22.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 138—LS 6538/DI 152


AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22.1. School Chaplains
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "school" includes the following:
(1) A school maintained by a school corporation.
(2) A charter school.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "school chaplain" refers to an
individual who meets the qualifications described in section 3 of
this chapter and whose primary responsibility is to provide advice,
guidance, and support services to students and employees of a
school.
Sec. 3. A school principal or superintendent may employ, or
approve as a volunteer, a school chaplain if the individual:
(1) obtains an expanded criminal history check and expanded
child protection index check as described in IC 20-26-5-10;
(2) has:
(A) never been convicted of an offense listed in
IC 20-28-5-8(c) or described in IC 20-28-5-8(d); or
(B) been convicted of an offense described in clause (A) but
the individual's conviction was reversed, vacated, or set
aside on appeal; and
(3) meets one (1) of the following:
(A) Has a baccalaureate degree in divinity, theology,
religious studies, or a related field and at least four (4)
years of counseling experience.
(B) Has a baccalaureate degree in divinity, theology,
religious studies or a related field and at least two (2) years
of counseling experience while working towards a master's
degree in divinity, theology, religious studies, or a related
field.
(C) Has a master's degree in divinity, theology, religious
studies, or a related field and at least two (2) years of
counseling experience.
Sec. 4. A school chaplain may do the following:
(1) Provide secular advice, guidance, and support services to
a student or employee of the school.
(2) Provide nonsecular advice, guidance, and support services
only if one (1) of the following applies:
(A) If the student is an emancipated minor or an adult, the
student receiving services provides permission allowing the
nonsecular advice, guidance, and support services.
(B) For an employee receiving services, the employee
2026 IN 138—LS 6538/DI 152


provides permission allowing the nonsecular advice,
guidance, and support services.
(C) If the student is an unemancipated minor, a parent of
the student and the student receiving services provide
permission allowing the nonsecular advice, guidance, and
support services.
Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), IC 20-33-7.5,
IC 31-32-11-1, and IC 31-33-5:
(1) communications made by a student to a school chaplain as
a school chaplain are privileged and confidential; and
(2) a school chaplain is not required to disclose
communications described in subdivision (1).
(b) A school chaplain shall disclose to a school counselor
communications made by a student to the school chaplain if the
communications concern:
(1) self-harm of the student; or
(2) an intention to harm others.
SECTION 3. IC 20-28-10-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.248-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Except as provided in IC 20-33-7.5, and
IC 31-32-11-1, and IC 31-33-5, a school counselor is immune from
disclosing privileged or confidential communication made to the
counselor as a counselor by a student.
(b) Except as provided in IC 20-33-7.5, and IC 31-32-11-1, and
IC 31-33-5, the matters communicated are privileged and protected
against disclosure.
SECTION 4. IC 20-33-7.5-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.248-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
require a school psychologist, a school nurse, a school social worker,
or a school counselor, or a school chaplain to violate a federal law or
regulation.
SECTION 5. IC 31-32-11-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.122-2009,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The privileged communication between:
(1) a husband and wife;
(2) a health care provider and the health care provider's patient;
(3) a:
(A) licensed social worker;
(B) licensed clinical social worker;
(C) licensed marriage and family therapist;
(D) licensed mental health counselor;
2026 IN 138—LS 6538/DI 152


(E) licensed addiction counselor; or
(F) licensed clinical addiction counselor;
and a client of any of the professionals described in clauses (A)
through (F);
(4) a school counselor and a student; or
(5) a school psychologist and a student; or
(6) a school chaplain and a student;
is not a ground for excluding evidence in any judicial proceeding
resulting from a report of a child who may be a victim of child abuse
or neglect or relating to the subject matter of the report or failing to
report as required by IC 31-33.
SECTION 6. IC 34-46-2-11.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.9. IC 20-26-22.1-5 (Concerning
communications made to a school chaplain).
2026 IN 138—LS 6538/DI 152